Utah statutes.
16-16-112.   Reservation of name.

(1)  A person may reserve the exclusive use of the name of a limited cooperative association, including a fictitious name for a foreign cooperative whose name is not available under Section 16-16-111, by delivering an application to the division for filing.  The application shall set forth the name and address of the applicant and the name proposed to be reserved.  If the division finds that the name applied for is available under Section 16-16-111, the division shall reserve the name for the applicant's exclusive use for a nonrenewable period of 120 days.

(2)  A person that has reserved a name for a limited cooperative association may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the division a signed notice of the transfer which states the name, street address, and, if different, the mailing address of the transferee.  If the person is an organizer of the association and the name of the association is the same as the reserved name, the delivery of articles of organization for filing by the division is a transfer by the person to the association.

